Idaho, session 2025, S1069.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-1807, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1807. LITERACY INTERVENTION PROGRAM. (1) Each school district and
public charter school shall establish an extended time literacy interven-
tion program for students who score basic or below basic on the fall reading
screening assessments or alternate reading screening assessment in kinder-
garten through grade 3 and submit it to the state board of education.
(2)(a) The program shall provide:
(i) Proven effective evidence-based substantial intervention
and shall include phonemic awareness, decoding intervention, vo-
cabulary, comprehension, and fluency as applicable to the student
based on a formative assessment designed to, at a minimum, iden-
tify such weaknesses;
(ii) A minimum of sixty (60) hours of supplemental instruction for
students in kindergarten through grade 3 who score below basic on
the reading screening assessment; and
(iii) A minimum of thirty (30) hours of supplemental instruction
for students in kindergarten through grade 3 who score basic on the
reading screening assessment.
(b) The program may include adaptive learning technology literacy
intervention tools as part of the literacy intervention program, must
include parent input, be in alignment with the Idaho comprehensive lit-
eracy plan, and be from the state board of education-approved provider
list established pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. Online or
digital instructional materials that are not part of a comprehensive
program do not have to be from the approved provider list.
(3)(a) The state board of education shall select adaptive learn-
ing technology literacy intervention providers through a request for
proposals process to provide adaptive learning technology literacy in-
tervention tools for school districts and charter schools to use as part
of their literacy intervention programs for students in kindergarten
through grade 3 that:
(i) Include an academic program focused on building age-appro-
priate literacy skills that, at a minimum, include phonological
awareness, phonics, fluency, comprehension, and vocabulary;
(ii) Use an evidence-based early intervention model;


(iii) Include a parental engagement and involvement component
that allows parents to participate in their student's use of the
tool at school or at home; and
(iv) Address early reading and literacy intervention through the
use of an interactive and adaptive computer software program.
(b) To remain on the approved provider list after the first year of
identification, programs must be evaluated each year to determine ef-
fectiveness by an independent external evaluator. The evaluation will
be based on a full academic year of implementation of tools implemented
with fidelity and will include, at a minimum, growth toward proficiency
measures.
(4) The state board of education shall identify national evi-
dence-based best practices and proven effective state intervention prac-
tices. The state department of education shall share state board of educa-
tion-identified intervention practices with school districts and charter
schools throughout the state and maintain a resource center of best prac-
tices for literacy intervention for students in kindergarten through grade
3. The resource center shall include, at a minimum, resources for parents
and schools.
(5) Of the funds appropriated for the purpose of this section, no more
than one hundred dollars ($100) per student may be used for transportation
costs.
(6) For the purpose of program reimbursement, the state department of
education shall adopt reporting forms, establish reporting dates, and adopt
such additional guidelines and standards as necessary to accomplish the pro-
gram goals that every child will read fluently and comprehend printed text on
grade level by the end of third grade 3.
(7) To ensure students receive high-quality literacy instruction and
intervention, the state department of education shall provide professional
development to districts and schools on best practices supporting literacy
instruction that includes Subject to appropriation, the state department of
education shall, over a multi-year period, provide professional development
to all teachers and elementary administrators serving students in kinder-
garten through grade 3. Such professional development shall be based on
the science of reading and shall include embedded coaching that integrates
evidence-based best practices supporting early literacy intervention, in-
cluding but not limited to data literacy, the statewide reading assessment,
and best practices as outlined in the Idaho comprehensive literacy plan.
Intervention program participation and effectiveness by school and district
Information regarding participation in the intervention program by school
districts and public charter schools and the effectiveness of such program
shall be presented annually to the state board of education, the legisla-
ture, and the governor.
(8) The state board of education or its delegate shall annually evalu-
ate the cost and efficacy of literacy interventions used throughout Idaho.
(9) The state board of education may promulgate rules implementing the
provisions of this section. At a minimum, such rules shall include student
trajectory growth to proficiency benchmarks and a timeline for reaching such
benchmarks.


SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.